Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions; Additions to and Deletions from State Highway System, 1954-1971

§ 65-3-1.
Collection of tolls on state highway forbidden; exception.

Subject only to the provisions hereinafter contained, it shall be unlawful for any person, acting privately or in any official capacity or as an employee of any subdivision of the state, to charge or collect any toll or other charge from any person for the privilege of traveling on any part of any highway which has been heretofore or may hereafter be designated as a state highway, and being a part of the state highway system, or on or across any bridge wholly within this state, which is a part of any such highway.

For a violation of this section, any judge or chancellor may, in termtime or vacation, grant an injunction upon complaint of the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

The provisions of this section shall be inapplicable to any toll road or bridge built or operated under the authority of Section 65-43-1 or Section 65-43-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8058; Laws, 1942, ch. 292; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 31; Laws, 1950, ch. 400; Laws, 2007, ch. 582, § 24, eff July 18, 2007 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).